North Carolina statutes. Chapter 104F. Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact.
§§ 104F-1 through 104F-5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-357, s. 2.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1987, c. 850, s. 26, had provided for withdrawal of North Carolina from the Compact unless every party state to the Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact (Compact) had enacted legislation to amend the Compact Law in force in that state in substantially the manner set out in s. 25 of the act by December 31, 1988, and unless the Congress of the United States had amended the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Amendments Act of 1985, Pub. L. No. 99-240, 99 Stat. 1842 (1986), so as to consent to the amendments to the Compact required to be made by s. 26 on or before December 31, 1992. Section 26 of c. 850 had also provided that the North Carolina Compact Commissioners would certify to the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of State that the requirements of the section had or had not been met, and that in the event that the party states to the Compact had not enacted legislation to amend the Compact as required by the section by December 31, 1988, Chapter 104F of the General Statutes would be repealed as of that date, and in the event that the Congress had not amended the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Policy Amendments Act so as to consent to the amendments required to be made by the section by December 31, 1992, Chapter 104F of the General Statutes would be repealed as of that date.

On December 22, 1988, the North Carolina Compact Commissioners certified that every party state had amended its compact law in substantially the same form as required by Session Laws 1987, c. 850, ss. 25 and 26.

On April 9, 1990, the North Carolina Compact Commissioners certified that the Congress of the United States had consented to the amendments in substantially the form required by North Carolina.

Session Laws 1999-357, s. 1 provides: “In accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 104F-1

, Article VII, Section (g) of the General Statutes, North Carolina hereby withdraws from membership as a party state in the Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact.”